Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1223
Revenue bonds; temporary bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds the governing body of the city may, under like restrictions, issue temporary bonds with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 10, p. 620;

C.S.1929, § 14-1210;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 2, p. 110;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1210;

R.S.1943, § 14-1223.